src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Imperative_Obj-kundams
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.23@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
!!This dialect form is realised
!!as the previous if followed by a clitic
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:">" 0:Ы2 "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > # ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь  "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:к  "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.53@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:Ы2 0:н 0:к  "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.56@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;
< 0:">" 0:м 0:а 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.21@" > VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;


LEXICON Optative-kadoms
:%>О1 Optative-noArrow ;

LEXICON Optative-kundams
:%> Optative-noArrow ;

!! 2012-05-04




LEXICON Optative-noArrow
+ScPl1:стано VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl2:стадо VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3:ст VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg1:зан VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg2:зат VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3:зО1 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!! Given in Grammar 2000
+Gr2000+ScPl1:зтано VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl2:зтадо VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl3:зт VerbEnd_Clitic ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Optative1_A_Obj ;

LEXICON Optative1_A_Obj
+ScSg1+OcSg2:стан VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Morph+ScSg1+OcSg2:зтан VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub+ScSg1+OcSg3:са VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg1+OcSg3:сса VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Dial+ScSg1+OcSg3:сан VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcSg3:ссО1 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!+ScSg3+OcSg3:сазо VerbEnd_Clitic ;
!! Introduced in Grammar 2000
+Gr2000+ScSg1+OcSg2:здан VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScSg3+OcSg3:зсО1 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScSg1+OcSg3:зса VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScSg3+OcSg3:зсы VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg1+OcPl3:зсынь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg2+OcSg1:змак VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScSg2+OcSg3:зсак VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScSg2+OcPl3:зсыть VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcSg1:змам VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcSg2:нзат VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcPl3:зсынзе VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl1+OcSg3:зсынек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScPl1+OcPl3:зсынек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScPl2+OcSg3:зсынк VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScPl2+OcPl3:зсынк VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcSg3:зсызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcPl3:зсызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg2+OcPl1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl2+OcSg1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl2+OcPl1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcPl1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcSg1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcPl1:змизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg1+OcPl2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl1+OcSg2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl1+OcPl2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScSg3+OcPl2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcSg2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+ScPl3+OcPl2:стадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScSg1+OcPl2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl1+OcSg2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl1+OcPl2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScSg3+OcPl2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl3+OcSg2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Gr2000+ScPl3+OcPl2:зтадызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;


LEXICON Nouns_Voiceless
Nouns_Pl ;
Nouns_Shibilant ;


LEXICON Nouns_Shibilant
+Ill+Indef:%>с VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss ;

LEXICON Nouns_Pl
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>тЬ2 kit-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl+Abe+Def:%>тне%>втеме kudo-Tenses-Obl  ;
+Pl+Abl+Def:%>тне%>де kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl+Com+Def:%>тне%>нек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pl+Comp+Def:%>тне%>шка kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl+DatCx+Def:%>тне%>нень VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pl+Ela+Def:%>тне%>стэ kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>тне%>нь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pl+Ill+Def:%>тне%>с VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pl+Ine+Def:%>тне%>сэ kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl+Lat+Def:%>тне%>в VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>тне kudo-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Pl+Prl+Def:%>тне%>ва kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+Pl+Tra+Def:%>тне%>кс osh-Tenses-Obl ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! used with infinitives
LEXICON kudo-Tenses1-4Inf
 kudo-Tenses-NomSg-4Inf ;
 kudo-Tenses-NomPl-4Inf ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-NomSg-4Inf
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-NomPl-4Inf
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3:%>тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;

!!!!

LEXICON osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf 
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic-4Inf ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-or-Clitic-4Inf 
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-4Inf ;


LEXICON osh-Possessive-Before-Clitic-4Inf
:%>О1 Possessive-Before-Clitic-noArrow-4Inf ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic-4Inf
:%> Possessive-Before-Clitic-noArrow-4Inf ;

LEXICON Possessive-Before-Clitic-noArrow-4Inf
+PxSg1:нЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+PxSg1+Use/Sub/Dial:м VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+PxSg2:тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+PxSg2+Use/Sub/Dial:нтЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+PxSg3:нзО1 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+PxPl1:нО1к VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+PxPl2:нк VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+PxPl3:ст VerbEnd_Clitic ;


!!!!


!! Used with deverbals
LEXICON kal-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses-NomSg ;
 kal-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-NomSg
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-NomSg-noClt ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-NomSg-noClt
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>О1линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>О1лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>О1ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-NomPl
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-NomPl-noClt ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-NomPl-noClt
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>О1линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>О1лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>О1льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-Abs
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>О1линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>О1лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>О1льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-Abs-1 ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-Abs-1
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-Obl
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-Obl-noClt ;

LEXICON kal-Tenses-Obl-noClt
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3:%>тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>О1линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>О1лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>О1ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>О1линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>О1лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>О1льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses1
 kal-Tenses-NomSg ;
 kal-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses-Abs
 kal-Tenses-Abs ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses-Obl
 kal-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses1
 lak-Tenses-NomSg ;
 lak-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses-NomSg
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-NomSg-noClt ;
 VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses-NomPl
 VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-NomPl-noClt ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses-Abs
 kal-Tenses-Abs ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses-Abs-1
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON lak-Tenses-Obl
 VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
 kal-Tenses-Obl-noClt ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses1
 kit-Tenses-NomSg ;
 kit-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses-NomSg
 kal-Tenses-NomSg ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses-NomPl
 kal-Tenses-NomPl ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>TLossтА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>TLossтА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses-Abs
 kal-Tenses-Abs ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses-Abs-1
 kal-Tenses-Abs-1 ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>TLossтА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>TLossтА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kit-Tenses-Obl
 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>TLossтА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>TLossтА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;


LEXICON kudo-Tenses1
 kudo-Tenses-NomSg ;
 kudo-Tenses-NomPl ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-NomSg
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-NomPl
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-Abs
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 kudo-Tenses-Abs-1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-Abs-1
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Tenses-Obl
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3:%>тЬ2 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
! =========== !
! Conjugation !
! =========== !

LEXICON sajems-Conjugation-4Inf
 kal-Conjugation-4Inf ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+OcSg1+Use/Sub/Dial:%>самизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+OcSg2+Use/Sub/Dial:%>тА2дызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcSg1+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лимизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcSg2+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лидизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcSg3+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+OcPl1+Use/Sub/Dial:%>самизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+OcPl2+Use/Sub/Dial:%>тА2дызь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcPl1+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лимизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcPl2+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лидизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+OcPl3+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1лизь VerbEnd_Clitic ;

!!

LEXICON kal-Conjugation-4Inf
 VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1:%>А2н VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2:%>А2т VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1:%>О1линь VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2:%>О1лить VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3:%>О1ль VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1:%>тА2но VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2:%>тА2до VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1:%>О1линек VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2:%>О1лиде VerbEnd_Clitic ;
+Pred+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3:%>О1льть VerbEnd_Clitic ;

!!
LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON osh-Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> osh-Tenses1 ;
